Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.020

Center created as division of state library—Depository library system—Rules.

There is hereby created as a division of the state library, and under the direction of the state librarian, a state publications distribution center. The center shall utilize the depository library system to permit citizens economical and convenient access to state publications, regardless of format. To this end the secretary of state shall make such rules as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2006 c 199 s 4; 2002 c 342 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 9; 1963 c 233 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 199: See note following RCW 27.04.045.

Effective date—2002 c 342: See RCW 27.04.901.